Florida, session 2026, HB4017.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Chapters 61-2525 and 69-1331, Laws of Florida,
are repealed.
Section 2. The Nassau County Recreation and Water
Conservation and Control District No. 1 is abolished. All assets
and liabilities of the district are transferred to the Board of
County Commissioners of Nassau County.
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4017 -01-er